src/fst/affixes/articles.lexc
LEXICON Definite
+Art+Def+Masc+Nom+Sg:i # ;
+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg:e # ;
+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg:o # ;
+Art+Def+Masc+Nom+Pl:i # ;
+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl:es # ;
+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Sg:a # ;
+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Sg:a # ;
+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl:es # ;
+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl:es # ;

LEXICON Indefinite
+Art+Indef+Masc+Nom+Sg:s # ;
+Art+Indef+Masc+Obl+Sg:0 # ;
+Art+Indef+Masc+Nom+Pl:0 # ;
+Art+Indef+Masc+Obl+Pl:s # ;
+Art+Indef+Fem+Nom+Sg:e # ;
+Art+Indef+Fem+Obl+Sg:e # ;
+Art+Indef+Fem+Nom+Pl:es # ;
+Art+Indef+Fem+Obl+Pl:es # ;
